Maine, session 132, LD670.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §4102, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A, §3
and affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
C. Compelling a person by force, threat of force, coercion or intimidation:
(1) To engage in conduct from which the person has a right or privilege to abstain;
or
(2) To abstain from conduct in which the person has a right to engage;
Page 1 - 132LR1916(03)